Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 53
TRANSPORTATION OF LIVESTOCK

Section

35-53-101. Brand inspection fee - animal shares - minimum fee - waiver permit - rules - definition.

As a means of financing the operations of the state board of stock inspection commissioners, the board is hereby authorized to levy and collect, through authorized brand inspectors, a per head inspection fee not to exceed the amount specified in section 35-41-104 on all livestock inspected. In addition, the board is authorized to levy and collect through authorized brand inspectors a minimum fee of not less than the amount specified in section 35-41-104 from each person, company, or corporation requesting the brand inspection or from whom a brand inspection is required by law. The inspection fee established pursuant to this subsection (1), but not the minimum fee, shall apply when branded or unbranded cattle, horses, or mules are being consigned to a Colorado licensed public livestock market or a licensed slaughter plant. It is the duty of all authorized Colorado brand inspectors to inspect all cattle, horses, and mules, except as exempt by law, that are offered for sale or to be moved interstate or intrastate and collect the inspection fee and minimum fee thereon. Within the limits prescribed by this subsection (1), the state board of stock inspection commissioners shall determine the amount of the inspection fee and minimum fee that shall be collected by authorized brand inspectors from the owner or person in charge of said cattle, horses, or mules before issuing a certificate of brand inspection granting leave to the owner or person in charge to offer the brand inspected cattle, horses, or mules for sale or movement interstate or intrastate. The inspection fee and minimum fee so collected shall be reported and transmitted to the state board of stock inspection commissioners at such time and in such manner as the board shall by regulation require.

When any individual, firm, association, partnership, or corporation, referred to in this article as "person", who owns or has had under control by lease or grazing permit for not less than five years a headquarters ranch or farm and who moves any cattle, horses, or mules from the headquarters place to another grazing or feeding ground that is also owned by the person or that has been controlled by lease or by grazing permit for not less than five years by the person, or when the person moves any cattle, horses, or mules from the grazing or feeding ground within this state to the person's headquarters ranch or farm in this state, the person, upon payment of a fee in an amount determined by the board by rule, may apply to the state board of stock inspection commissioners for and may be granted a brand inspection fee waiver permit, irrespective of the fact such headquarters ranch or farm and the other grazing or feeding grounds exceed seventy-five miles from the point of origin provided for in section 35-53-105 (4)(f) or that the grazing or feeding grounds are outside this state. The brand inspection fee waiver permit shall entitle the permittee to move cattle, horses, and mules for grazing or feeding purposes, with no change of ownership involved, between the headquarters ranch or farm and the other grazing or feeding grounds, with no charge for brand inspection and no collection of a beef board fee. If the livestock are moved outside this state, the permittee shall guarantee that, if, for any reason, the livestock are not returned to the Colorado ranch or farm, the permittee will immediately pay the required brand inspection and beef board fee to the board.

When performing an inspection of livestock sold as animal shares in accordance with section 25-4-1617, an authorized Colorado brand inspector shall inspect the livestock only once immediately before slaughter notwithstanding the livestock being sold to multiple purchasers.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners shall promulgate rules implementing this subsection (3), including establishing procedures for a single brand inspection before slaughter of livestock intended to be sold as animal shares in accordance with section 25-4-1617.

As used in this subsection (3), "animal share" has the meaning set forth in section 25-4-1617 (2)(b).

Source:

L. 03:

p. 439, § 16.

R.S. 08:

§ 6406.

L. 13:

p. 592, § 2.

L. 21:

p. 751, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3208.

L. 27:

p. 665, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 125.

L. 43:

p. 585, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-1.

L. 65:

p. 223, § 1.

L. 67:

p. 194, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 220, § 1.

L. 74:

(1) R&RE, p. 214, § 1, effective February 27.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1405, § 3, effective May 16.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 1848, § 48, effective May 31.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1791, § 85, effective June 6.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 273, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 650, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) added, (SB 21-079), ch. 74, p. 296, § 2, effective April 29.

Cross references:

For additional fees to be collected on inspection of cattle and calves, see § 35-57-117.

35-53-102. Duties of brand inspector.

It is the duty of the brand inspector, who shall be notified as provided in section 35-53-105, or shall be selected by the board of stock inspection commissioners, to inspect the brands and earmarks of any cattle, horses, or mules to be transported by rail, truck, or other conveyance from any point within this state to any point within or without the state or to be driven out of the state, and to make a report to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, which he shall certify to as correct, of the result of such inspection at least once every thirty days or oftener if in the opinion of the board of stock inspection commissioners it is necessary to do so. It is also the duty of said brand inspector to furnish to any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any agents, servants, or employees thereof, having cattle, horses, or mules destined to be so shipped or driven, a certificate to the effect that he has duly inspected the brands and earmarks of any such cattle, horses, or mules enumerated and designated in the notice furnished such brand inspector.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 441, § 21.

R.S. 08:

§ 6412.

C.L.

§ 3214.

L. 27:

p. 668, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 131.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-2.

35-53-103. False report - certificate - penalty.

Any inspector who knowingly makes any false certificate under the provisions of section 35-53-102 to the state board of stock inspection commissioners commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 442, § 22.

R.S. 08:

§ 6413.

C.L.

§ 3215.

CSA:

C. 160, § 132.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-3.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3284, § 651, effective March 1, 2022.

35-53-104. Certificate needed for shipment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 03:

p. 440, § 18.

L. 07:

p. 591, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6408.

C.L.

§ 3210.

L. 27:

p. 666, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 127.

L. 51:

p. 785, § 1A.

L. 53:

p. 584, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-4.

L. 84:

Entire section repealed, p. 944, § 1, effective March 26.

35-53-105. Inspection before shipment - place.

Whenever any cattle, horses, or mules are to be transported from any point within this state to any point within or without this state, it is the duty of the transportation company and the person selling and delivering cattle, horses, or mules to other persons for transportation to make application to the state board of stock inspection commissioners or some duly authorized brand inspector of the board to inspect the brands and earmarks of any such cattle, horses, or mules, stating in the application the time when and the place where the animals will be ready for inspection, giving sufficient notice for the inspector to appear at the place designated in such application, and to provide adequate corrals to inspect such cattle, horses, or mules in daylight. It is the duty of such inspector, or some other inspector to be designated by the board, to appear at the place designated in such application and inspect such cattle, horses, or mules, make the necessary record, and give the necessary certificate required by the provisions of this article.

Whenever any cattle, horses, or mules are to be driven from any point within this state to any point within or without this state, it is the duty of the owner or person in charge of such animals to make application to the state board of stock inspection commissioners or some duly authorized inspector of the board to have the same inspected.

In all cases of cattle, horses, or mules transported by rail, the place of inspection shall be at some stockyard at the proposed point of shipment of such animals. All cattle, horses, or mules to be transported by truck or by similar conveyance within this state or beyond its boundaries shall be inspected at the point of origin or some convenient unloading point en route designated by the state board of stock inspection commissioners or one of its inspectors before being transported from the state or within the state. Cattle, horses, or mules to be driven beyond the boundaries of the state shall be inspected not less than three miles from the state line or at some convenient point designated by the state board of stock inspection commissioners or by one of its duly authorized brand inspectors before being driven from the state.

This section shall not apply to:

Unbranded registered purebred horses leaving a Colorado licensed race track that are accompanied by a bill of lading or statement showing the point of loading and the destination;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 161, § 1, effective April 2, 1992.)

Cattle, horses, or mules being driven or transported by truck to a Colorado licensed public livestock market within the state, where Colorado brand inspection is maintained, that are accompanied by a shipper's certificate and agreement, signed by the owner or person in charge and showing the point of origin, the point of destination, and the brands on such cattle, horses, or mules being transported;

Cattle being transported by truck to a Colorado licensed packing house where all of the cattle slaughtered are inspected by a Colorado brand inspector immediately prior to slaughter, accompanied by a shipper's certificate and agreement, signed by the owner, showing the point of origin, the point of destination, and the brands on such cattle being transported;

Cattle, horses, or mules being driven or transported within the boundaries of the state between established ranges, pastures, and properties owned, leased, or under the control of the owner of such livestock, so long as such livestock are not being driven or transported more than seventy-five miles from the point of origin and are not changing ownership. If such livestock are being driven or transported by road, the shortest passable road route shall be used. All such cattle, horses, or mules being transported and excepted by this paragraph (f) shall be accompanied by a statement, signed by the owner or person in charge, showing the point of origin and the destination and the brands on such cattle, horses, or mules being transported.

Any registered purebred beef or dairy cattle being transported to or from the national western stock show or the Colorado state fair, if such beef or dairy cattle are accompanied by registration papers identifying the legal owner;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 161, § 1, effective April 2, 1992.)

Any cattle, horses, or mules which are used in rodeo competition within the state of Colorado and which are branded with the owner's state-recorded ownership brand, together with a contest number identification brand, when being transported between rodeos within the state of Colorado, but only if the same have first been inspected by an authorized brand inspector and the fees therefor paid at the beginning of the rodeo season before the cattle, horses, or mules have been moved from the owner's headquarters unless circumstances arise which will justify an inspection for brands by an authorized Colorado brand inspector. Inspection by an authorized brand inspector and collection of the brand inspection fee shall be required prior to any change of ownership or other disposal of such cattle, horses, or mules. In addition, any cattle, horses, or mules purchased for use in rodeo competition shall be inspected by a Colorado brand inspector and a Colorado brand certificate issued before any such livestock is branded with the rodeo stock owner's state-recorded ownership brand. The exemption granted by this paragraph (i) shall not apply to any cattle, horses, or mules used in rodeo competition for which the requirements of this paragraph (i) have not been met.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent an authorized Colorado brand inspector from investigating and inspecting any cattle, horses, or mules being driven or transported in this state to determine if the requirements of this section have been met. If no violations have occurred, no official inspection shall be deemed to have been made nor shall any brand inspection fee be charged. If any violation is found, the brand inspector may require an official inspection of such livestock and collect the fee therefor, or may seek prosecution of the offender pursuant to section 35-53-112, or both.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 440, § 19.

L. 07:

p. 592, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 6409.

L. 21:

p. 749, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3211.

L. 27:

p. 667, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 128.

L. 51:

p. 785, § 2.

L. 53:

p. 584, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-5.

L. 65:

p. 226, §§ 1, 2.

L. 67:

pp. 232, 233, §§ 1-3.

L. 84:

(5) amended, p. 944, § 2, effective March 26.

L. 89:

(4)(f) amended, p. 1405, § 4, effective May 16.

L. 92:

(4) amended, p. 161, § 1, effective April 2.

35-53-106. Substitution of animals - penalty.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation, or any agent or employee thereof, who ships any animals other than those described in the certificate provided by the brand inspector inspecting such animals, as provided in section 35-53-105, or who removes any of said animals and substitutes others therefor without the knowledge of said inspector commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 441, § 20.

R.S. 08:

§ 6411.

C.L.

§ 3213.

CSA:

C. 160, § 130.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3284, § 652, effective March 1, 2022.

35-53-107. Disposition of stock taken by officer.

In making any inspection of any animals prior to shipment by rail, truck, or other conveyance or removal from the state, if any inspector finds any animals bearing marks and brands other than those of the owner of the other cattle in said shipment and if said owner or shipper fails to exhibit a bill of sale or other authority for the possession of said animals in said shipment, the inspector shall forthwith declare them to be estrays and shall take possession of the same for the state board of stock inspection commissioners and dispose of the same according to the rules and regulations prescribed by said board.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 442, § 24.

R.S. 08:

§ 6415.

C.L.

§ 3217.

L. 27:

p. 670, § 7.

CSA:

C. 160, § 134.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-7.

35-53-108. Disposition of estrays.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners is empowered to make such reasonable rules and regulations regarding the disposition of estrays taken up by inspectors, as provided in section 35-53-107, as may seem to said board to be proper and just and for the best interests of the owners of same.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 443, § 25.

R.S. 08:

§ 6416.

C.L.

§ 3218.

CSA:

C. 160, § 135.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-8.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24; for disposition of estrays generally, see article 44 of this title 35; for powers of municipalities to restrain and impound estrays, see § 31-15-401 (1)(m).

35-53-109. Amount received paid to owner.

Any person, association, or corporation establishing to the satisfaction of the state board of stock inspection commissioners the ownership of any estray animals which have been sold by said board, and the amount realized from such sale deposited in the estray fund, as provided in section 35-41-102, shall be forthwith paid the amount for which said animals were sold.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 443, § 27.

R.S. 08:

§ 6418.

L. 09:

p. 508, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3220.

CSA:

C. 160, § 137.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-9.

35-53-110. Proceeds claimed within three years.

All moneys in the estray fund, derived from the sale of estray animals by the state board of stock inspection commissioners or any inspector acting under the authority of said board, which has been in the possession of said board of stock inspection commissioners for six years or longer from the date of sale of such estray animals and for which no valid claim has been made shall be turned into the brand inspection fund of said board, and all claims for moneys from the estray fund made by the owners of cattle sold as estrays by said board shall be made within three years from the date of sale of the same or the same shall be forever barred and no moneys shall be paid upon claims made after three years from date of such sale. The funds so transferred from the estray fund may be used by the said board, under proper vouchers, for the prosecution of persons charged with theft of livestock and for general expenses of the board.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 443, § 28.

R.S. 08:

§ 6419.

C.L.

§ 3221.

CSA:

C. 160, § 138.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-10.

Cross references:

For the estray fund and the brand inspection fund, see § 35-41-102; for theft generally, see § 18-4-401; for theft of livestock, see §§ 35-43-128 and 35-54-105.

35-53-111. Sanitary rules as to movement of livestock - quarantine - penalty.

The state agricultural commission may make and adopt such quarantine and sanitary regulations affecting the movement of livestock into and out of the state of Colorado and within the borders of said state as may from time to time be necessary to prevent the introduction into the state or the spread within the state of any contagious or infectious disease, and the expense of such quarantine measures and the carrying out of such regulations shall be made by the imposition of a fee of three cents per head on all cattle and horses and one and one-half cents per head on all sheep entering the state of Colorado from any quarantine or infected territory. Whenever the state agricultural commission knows or has good reason to believe that any contagious or infectious disease exists in any locality in any other state, territory, or country or that there are conditions which render domestic animals from such infected district liable to bring such disease into this state, it may report the same to the governor of the state of Colorado whereupon, by proclamation, he shall prohibit the importation of any such livestock into this state, unless accompanied by a certificate of health given by the state veterinarian or sanitary inspectors appointed by the state agricultural commission, which veterinarian or sanitary inspectors shall carefully examine all such livestock previous to the giving of such certificate.

All fees connected with such examinations are to be paid by the owner of such stock so examined; but no fee shall be collected from the owner of any animals entering this state by railroad, in direct route to other states or territories, which do not remain in the state of Colorado for a longer period than is required for feeding and watering in transit. Any person, firm, or corporation who violates or disregards any of the provisions of a proclamation issued by the governor in compliance with this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in subsection (1) of this section, the state agricultural commission by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the state agricultural commission by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 437, § 10.

R.S. 08:

§ 6397.

L. 21:

p. 753, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3180.

CSA:

C. 160, § 83.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-25.

L. 63:

p. 287, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-11.

L. 98:

(3) added, p. 1342, § 67, effective June 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3285, § 653, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For quarantine procedures to prevent the spread of infectious or contagious diseases among the domestic animals within the state, see §§ 35-50-111 to 35-50-115.

35-53-112. Shipping prior to inspection - penalty.

Any person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation, or any employee thereof, who willfully violates any provision of sections 35-53-101 to 35-53-112, except as otherwise provided in said sections, or who moves or causes to be moved any single head or any herd of cattle, horses, or mules within this state or beyond the boundaries of this state without having had the same inspected and cleared by a Colorado brand inspector commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

It is the duty of the district attorney of the judicial district in this state in which any such violation occurs to initiate criminal proceedings and prosecute the same to effectively enforce the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 442, § 23.

R.S. 08:

§ 6414.

C.L.

§ 3216.

L. 27:

p. 669, § 6.

CSA:

C. 160, § 133.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-8.

L. 63:

p. 187, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-12.

L. 67:

p. 186, § 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 883, § 62, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 849, § 129, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1550, § 325, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3285, § 654, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 54 (1980).

Cross references:

(1) For theft generally, see § 18-4-401; for theft of livestock, see §§ 35-43-128 and 35-54-105.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-53-113. Definitions.

As used in sections 35-53-113 to 35-53-119, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Carcasses" means one or more animal bodies or parts thereof, but not less than one quarter of an animal body.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 766, § 9.

CSA:

C. 160, § 49.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-19.

L. 63:

p. 187, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-19.

35-53-114. Inspector may refuse certificate.

If any duly authorized inspector finds any livestock, or the carcasses thereof, in the possession of any person, firm, or corporation desiring to transport the same by motor or other vehicle and said person, firm, or corporation in charge of said livestock, or the carcasses thereof, is not in possession of a bill of sale duly executed or cannot furnish other satisfactory proof that said person, firm, or corporation is the lawful owner of said livestock, or the carcasses thereof, or if said inspector has good reason to believe that said livestock, or said carcasses, or any of them, are stolen, said inspector shall refuse to issue the certificate authorized in section 35-53-102 authorizing the transportation of said livestock, or the carcasses thereof, by motor or other vehicle and shall take possession of the same.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 763, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-13.

35-53-115. Inspection and transportation of hides - fee - records.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, railroad company, or other common carrier to transport or cause to be transported within this state or beyond the limits of this state any hides that have not been inspected and tagged by a duly authorized brand inspector of the state board of stock inspection commissioners for the district in which such hides are shipped. A certificate of inspection as provided for in section 35-53-102 shall accompany all shipments and shall be exhibited by the carrier or his or her agent at any time upon demand of any inspector or peace officer. For each hide thus inspected there shall be paid by the owner or holder thereof a fee in the amount prescribed by the board, pursuant to section 35-41-104, to the inspector before he or she issues the hide inspection certificate authorizing the transportation of such hides.

Each inspector of hides shall keep a complete record of all inspections made by such inspector and shall forward to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, together with the fee collected, on blanks furnished for that purpose, a complete report of each inspection, giving the names of the purchasers and shippers of the hides, as well as all of the brands thereon. Said report and fee so collected shall be reported and transmitted to said board at such time and in such manner as the board shall by regulation require, and said report shall be preserved by the brand commissioner as part of the records of such commissioner's office. This section shall not apply to slaughter plants or packinghouses where all cattle are inspected immediately prior to slaughter by a duly authorized brand inspector of the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 766, § 8.

CSA:

C. 160, § 48.

L. 53:

p. 594, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-14.

L. 65:

p. 224, § 2.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1616, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1710, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 273, § 9, effective August 5.

35-53-116. Hides inspected - fee - seizure.

In the event any authorized brand inspector is making an inspection of hides or the inspection of any slaughtered carcasses, the hides from all such carcasses shall be exhibited to the inspector at the time of the inspection, and if the inspector is satisfied that the person, firm, or corporation is acting within the law, the inspector, in addition to furnishing the certificate, shall tag or mark the carcasses and hides in a manner to be designated by the state board of stock inspection commissioners as evidence that the same have been inspected. In any case where the inspector has reason to doubt the ownership of any carcass or of any hide, he shall refuse to write the hide inspection certificate and shall be authorized to seize any such hide or any such carcass of beef and hold the same for proper proof of ownership and to dispose of the same as provided in sections 35-53-118 and 35-53-119.

In the event that any authorized brand inspector is making any inspection of hides received at any hide house, the owner or person in charge of such hide house shall exhibit any hides in his possession and shall show proof of ownership evidenced by proper bill of sale showing the brand, if any, on the hide or by a brand inspection certificate issued by a brand inspector in the district at the point of origin of the hide. The inspector is authorized to seize and impound any hides in the possession of any hide house that are not properly cleared for ownership by a valid bill of sale or brand inspection certificate and to dispose of the same as provided by law for the disposal of estrays.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 764, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 43.

L. 53:

p. 593, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-15.

Cross references:

For disposition of estrays, see article 44 of this title 35.

35-53-117. Officer may inspect vehicle.

Any duly authorized inspector, sheriff, deputy sheriff, or peace officer is authorized to stop and inspect any motor or other vehicle transporting or containing livestock, or the carcasses thereof, and demand from the person operating said motor or other vehicle the exhibition of a bill of sale, permit, or certificate. If any person who transports or who has in possession said livestock, or the carcasses thereof, is unable to exhibit to such inspector or peace officer said bill of sale, permit, or certificate, said inspector or peace officer is empowered to arrest, with or without warrant, any such person operating said motor or other vehicle, to take possession of the same and the livestock, or carcasses therein, and to retain such possession until the person operating such motor or other vehicle can produce satisfactory evidence that he, or the person, firm, or corporation for whom the same is being transported, is the lawful owner thereof or until such livestock, or the carcasses thereof, are disposed of as provided in sections 35-53-118 and 35-53-119.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 764, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 44.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-16.

35-53-118. Officer may sell carcasses.

If said inspector or peace officer deems it necessary to sell said carcasses so taken to prevent the loss of same by spoiling, he is authorized to do so, retaining the sale price thereof in his possession to be disposed of as provided in section 35-53-119.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 765, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 45.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-17.

35-53-119. Livestock, carcasses, or proceeds of sale.

If within a period of ten days the ownership of said livestock or said carcasses is shown and established, said livestock or carcasses or proceeds of sale shall be delivered to the owner. If, however, within such period the ownership of said livestock or carcasses is not shown or established, then the same shall be sold or disposed of under the direction of the said board. Any moneys derived from the sale of said livestock or carcasses shall be placed in the estray fund in charge of the board of stock inspection commissioners as provided by law and shall be subject to the same provisions applicable to said estray fund.

In all such cases the facts concerning the detention and sale of such livestock or carcasses shall be reported to the district attorney of the judicial district wherein such livestock or carcasses were detained and sold.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 765, § 6.

CSA:

C. 160, § 46.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-18.

Cross references:

For the estray fund, see § 35-41-102.

35-53-120. Penalty.

Any person, whether acting in the person's own behalf or as agent, servant, officer, or employee of any firm, association, or corporation, who violates any provisions of sections 35-53-113 to 35-53-119 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 767, § 10.

CSA:

C. 160, § 50.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-20.

L. 63:

p. 187, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-20.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3285, § 655, effective March 1, 2022.

35-53-121. Owners' transportation permit.

It is unlawful for any person to transport or carry live sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, domestic fowl, or the carcasses thereof upon any public highway of the state of Colorado or over or across any lands of which the one so transporting said animals is not the owner, lessee, or tenant without the written permission of the owner of said livestock or domestic fowl, or the carcasses thereof, for such transportation. Such permit shall contain the name of the owner of said livestock or domestic fowl, ages, sex, and brands thereon, if any, the date of transportation, the points of origin and destination of the shipment, and the person to whom consigned.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 768, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 51.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-21.

35-53-122. Duty to exhibit permit.

Any driver or other person in charge or control of any truck, automobile, or other vehicle so transporting or carrying live sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, domestic fowl, or the carcasses thereof, upon demand of any peace officer of the state of Colorado, shall exhibit to such peace officer his permit to carry said livestock or domestic fowl, or the carcasses thereof, or in lieu of such permit, upon demand of such peace officer, shall make a written statement which shall contain the same information as is specified in section 35-53-121.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 769, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-22.

35-53-123. Inspection report of officer.

Said officer shall make out and sign a complete inspection report showing the date and place of inspection, the number and kind of said livestock, poultry, or the carcasses thereof transported, the person in charge of the truck, automobile, or other vehicle, the license number, if any, of the vehicle, and the facts set forth in the written permit or written statement, which inspection report shall be filed forthwith in the office of the sheriff of the county where it may be examined at all reasonable hours by any person.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 769, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-23.

35-53-124. Penalty.

Any person who makes a false or forged permit as specified in section 35-53-121 or a false or forged statement as specified in section 35-53-122, or who knowingly exhibits or causes to be exhibited to any peace officer any such false or forged permit or statement, or who, upon request of any peace officer of the state of Colorado, refuses or neglects to exhibit a permit or make a statement as provided in section 35-53-122 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 770, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-24.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3286, § 656, effective March 1, 2022.

35-53-125. Inspection at point of origin.

Any cattle moved from a pasture shall be inspected for brands by an authorized brand inspector at the point of origin before they are placed in a feed lot, and proof of ownership shall be shown on demand by any Colorado brand inspector or any other interested party. Any cattle found carrying questionable brands when an inspection is made shall be held and handled as estrays or questionably-owned cattle, as provided by law. Such inspections shall be made before mixing with any other cattle, and when any uninspected cattle are mixed prior to an inspection, an inspection shall be made on all the cattle so mixed, and the inspection fee shall be collected. A brand inspector shall be authorized to release the cattle to be inspected at the point of origin for an inspection to be made at any designated place where proper facilities are available.

In the event that two or more parties claim ownership of questionably-owned cattle, the state board of stock inspection commissioners may provide for arbitration of the claim of ownership under the supervision of the said board or under the supervision of such officer or agent of the said board as may be designated by the said board.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 582, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-25.

L. 71:

p. 164, § 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 274, § 10, effective August 5.

35-53-126. Inspection at market - penalty.

All cattle that are subject to inspection in the state by virtue of any law or regulation, on arrival at any market, shall be inspected by a duly authorized brand inspector, whether or not they have been previously inspected at the point of origin, before they are taken to the scales for weighing or are weighed at such market unless such cattle are released by an authorized brand inspector. Any person, whether acting in his or her own behalf or as an agent, servant, officer, or employee of any person, firm, corporation, or association, who violates any provisions of this section commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 53:

pp. 580, 581, §§ 2, 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-26.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3286, § 657, effective March 1, 2022.

35-53-127. Brand inspection contracts.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements, within the limits of funds available therefor, with any agency, governmental or otherwise, to perform the duties imposed by law upon said state board of stock inspection commissioners with respect to brand inspection. All contracts and brand inspections pursuant to such contracts shall be subject to the approval and control of the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 156, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 8-3-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-27.

35-53-128. Brand inspectors - powers of arrest.

In addition to his other duties, a duly appointed brand inspector is authorized to ride the ranges, pastures, and other localities within the state to protect the livestock industry of the state from depredations and theft.

Brand inspectors in the exercise of their statutory duties are vested with all the powers of arrest, with or without a warrant, conferred upon peace officers as set forth in section 16-3-101, C.R.S.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners may authorize brand inspectors to equip their cars with sirens, red lights, and other devices for use in the apprehension of persons suspected of theft of livestock or violation of stock inspection laws. The board may also authorize the said stock inspectors to carry arms.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 189, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-3-28.

Cross references:

For use of siren and red light, see §§ 42-4-213 and 42-4-220; for theft generally, see § 18-4-401; for theft of livestock, §§ 35-43-128 and 35-54-105.